Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 6

Metropolitan Celebration Authority Act

7-6-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Metropolitan Celebration Authority Act.”

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3764.

7-6-102. Legislative declaration and purpose — Exemption from taxation.

It is hereby declared that metropolitan celebration authorities created pursuant to this chapter shall be public and governmental bodies acting as agencies and instrumentalities of the creating municipality, and that the acquisition, construction, operation and financing of improvements by such authorities are hereby declared to be a public and governmental purpose and a matter of public necessity.

The property and revenues of the authority or any interests in property and revenues shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation.

The authorities shall be created for the purpose of implementing projects to commemorate and celebrate the bicentennial anniversary of the principal city of any county adopting a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-3765.

7-6-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” means a metropolitan celebration authority created pursuant to the authority of this chapter;

“Board” means the board of commissioners of an authority;

“Bonds” includes notes, interim certificates or other obligations of an authority;

“Creating municipality” means any county having adopted a metropolitan form of government that creates an authority pursuant to this chapter;

“Executive officer” means the mayor, county mayor or other chief executive officer of any creating municipality; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-3766; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

7-6-104. Creation of a metropolitan celebration authority.

Any county having a metropolitan form of government may create a metropolitan celebration authority in the manner provided in this section.

The governing body of the creating municipality shall adopt, and its executive officer shall approve, a resolution calling for a public hearing on the question of creating a metropolitan celebration authority. Notice of the date, hour, place and purpose of the hearing shall be published at least once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the creating municipality, the last publication to be at least one (1) week prior to the date set for the hearing.

The hearing shall be had before the governing body and all interested persons shall have an opportunity to be heard.

After the hearing, if the governing body determines that the public convenience and necessity require the creation of an authority, it shall adopt, and its executive officer shall approve, a resolution so declaring and creating an authority, which resolution shall designate the name and principal office address of the authority. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the secretary of state and with the Tennessee historical commission, along with the resolution approving the appointment of the board as provided for in § 7-6-105, and, upon the adoption and filing, the authority shall constitute a body politic and corporate, with all the powers provided in this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-3767.

7-6-105. Board of commissioners.

The authority shall be governed by a board of commissioners composed of eleven (11) members. Three (3) members shall be officers of the state, who shall be appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality after consultation with the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. The executive officer of the creating municipality or the executive officer's designee shall be a member. Seven (7) members shall be appointed by the executive officer of the creating municipality subject to confirmation by the governing body of the municipality. The executive officer or the executive officer's designee shall serve during the term of the executive officer. The three (3) members who shall be officers of the state shall serve while holding their respective offices. The seven (7) members appointed by the executive officer subject to confirmation by the governing body shall serve for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4), five (5), six (6) and seven (7) years, respectively.

Nothwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), any member may be removed at the pleasure of the executive officer.

The board shall elect from its members a chair and vice chair, each of whom shall be voting members, and shall adopt bylaws and rules of procedure.

A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Except as expressly otherwise specified, all powers granted in this chapter to the authority shall be exercised by the board.

Commissioners shall receive no salary, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-3768.

7-6-106. Officers and employees.

The board shall appoint an executive director who shall be the chief executive and administrative officer of the authority, and shall enter into a contract with the executive director establishing the executive director's salary and term of office.

The executive director shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the board, the following additional officers: a secretary, an auditor, a legal counsel and a treasurer.

All other officers and employees of the authority shall be appointed by the executive director.

The executive director shall attend all meetings of the board.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-3769.

7-6-107. General powers.

An authority has all of the powers necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter, excluding the exercise of the power of eminent domain and the power to levy and collect taxes and special assessments, including, but not limited to, the power to:

Have perpetual succession, sue and be sued, and adopt a corporate seal;

Acquire real or personal property or any interest in real or personal property by gift, lease, or purchase, for any of the purposes provided in this chapter and sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any such property;

Enter into contracts and agreements with any person or entity for any of the purposes provided for in this chapter; and

Make application directly to the proper federal, state, county and municipal officials and agencies, or to any other source, public or private, for loans, grants, guarantees or other financial assistance in aid of the purposes provided for in this chapter.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-3770.

7-6-108. Bonds.

The authority has the power to issue negotiable bonds from time to time in order to accomplish any of the purposes authorized by this chapter, and it also has the power to issue refunding bonds for the purposes, and in the amounts and manner provided in title 9, chapter 21. All the bonds shall be payable solely from all or any part of the revenues, income and charges of the authority and the bonds shall not constitute an obligation of the creating municipality, and the bonds shall so state.

The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board and shall bear such date, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, payable annually or semiannually, be in such form and denominations, be subject to such terms of redemption with or without premium, carry such registration privileges, be payable in such medium and at such place or places, be executed in such manner, all as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds. The bonds may be sold at public or private sale in such manner and for such amount as the board may determine.

The resolution may include any covenants with the bondholders deemed necessary by the board to make the bonds secure and marketable, including, but not limited to, covenants regarding the application of the bond proceeds; the pledging, application and securing of the revenues of the authority; the creation and maintenance of reserves; the investment of funds; the issuance of additional bonds; remedies of bondholders; the vesting in a trustee or trustees such powers and rights as may be necessary to secure the bonds and the revenues and funds from which they are payable; the terms and conditions upon which the bondholders may exercise their rights and remedies; the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; the definition, consequences and remedies of an event of default; the amendment of such resolution; and the appointment of a receiver in the event of default.

Any holder of any such bonds, including any trustee for any bondholders, may enforce their rights against the authority, its board or any officer, agent or employee thereof by mandamus, injunction or other action in any court of competent jurisdiction, subject to the covenants included in the bond resolution.

All sums received as accrued interest from the sale of any bonds shall be applied to the payment of interest on such bonds. All sums received as principal or premium from the sale shall be applied to the purpose for which the bonds were issued, and may include, but not limited to, expenses for fiscal, legal, engineering and architectural services, expenses for the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds, expenses for obtaining an economic feasibility survey in connection with the bonds, and to create a reserve for the payment of not exceeding one (1) year's interest on the bonds.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter executed by officers in office on the date of the execution shall be valid obligations of the authority, notwithstanding that before the delivery of the bonds any and all of the persons executing bonds shall have ceased to be such officers.

Bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and the income from the bonds, shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

All public officers and bodies of the state, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, all savings banks and savings institutions, including savings and loan associations, all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and all other fiduciaries in the state may legally invest funds within their control in bonds of the authority.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-3771; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 13.

7-6-109. Certain powers of creating municipality.

The creating municipality has all of the necessary power in order to further the purposes of this chapter, including, without limitation, any and all of which powers may be exercised by resolution of its governing body, the power to:

Advance, donate or lend money or real or personal property to the authority;

Provide that any funds on hand or to become available to it for celebration purposes shall be paid directly to the authority;

Cause water, sewer, gas, electric or other utility services to be provided to the authority;

Sell, lease, dedicate, donate or otherwise convey to the authority any of its interest in real or personal property, or grant easements, licenses or other rights or privileges therein to the authority; and

Open and improve streets, roads and alleys at the request of the authority.

None of the foregoing powers may be exercised either directly or indirectly by the municipality to provide real estate that had been condemned by eminent domain subsequent to May 30, 1979, while such real estate was in use as residential dwellings, it being the intent of this chapter that none of the power or authority created in this chapter and vested in either the creating municipality or the celebration authority to be created shall be exercised in such a way that real estate utilized in creating or carrying out the purposes or functions of the metropolitan celebration authority provided in § 7-6-104 shall have been condemned or acquired by eminent domain after May 30, 1979, while it was in use as residential dwellings.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 9; T.C.A., § 6-3772.

7-6-110. Dissolution — Disposition of property.

Whenever the governing body of a creating municipality shall by resolution determine that the purposes for which the authority was created have been substantially accomplished and that all the bonds and other obligations of the authority have been fully paid or secured and payment provided for, then the executive officer of the creating municipality shall execute and file for record with the secretary of state and the Tennessee historical commission a certificate of dissolution reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Upon filing, the authority shall be dissolved, and title to all funds and other properties of the authority, real, personal and mixed, at the time of the dissolution shall vest in and be delivered to such creating municipality.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 10; T.C.A., § 6-3773.

7-6-111. Supplemental nature of chapter.

The powers conferred by this chapter are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and are not in substitution for such powers, and the limitations imposed by this chapter shall not affect such powers.

The powers granted in this chapter may be exercised without regard to requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any other law or charter, except as expressly provided for in this chapter.

Any county having adopted a metropolitan form of government may create a metropolitan celebration authority as provided in this chapter without the necessity of a charter amendment, notwithstanding anything in its charter to the contrary.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-3774.

7-6-112. Construction — Chapter controlling.

This chapter shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of this chapter, and insofar as this chapter may be inconsistent with any other law, this chapter shall be controlling.

Acts 1979, ch. 389, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-3775.